North Carolina, session 2025, SB544.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 147-64.6(c) reads as rewritten:
"(c) Responsibilities. – The Auditor is responsible for the following acts and activities:
…
(24) The Auditor shall periodically audit crisis pregnancy centers that receive State
funds."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*S544-v-1*